Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-827
Violations; proceedings; subornation of perjury.

Whoever shall knowingly prepare, or cause to be prepared, a report, return, or answer required by sections 59-801 to 59-831 that is false, as aforesaid, shall be guilty of subornation of perjury and punished by law.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 21, p. 645;

R.S.1913, § 4065;

C.S.1922, § 3468;

C.S.1929, § 59-821;

R.S.1943, § 59-827;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 16.